District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

4-1211

Assets and resources exempt from determination of eligibility.

Repealed.

History

Mar. 16, 1989, D.C. Law 7-221, § 12, 36 DCR 553
Apr. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 12-241, § 7, 46 DCR 905

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 3-1011.

Temporary Amendment of Section

For temporary (225 day) repeal of section, see § 7 of Self-Sufficiency Promotion Temporary Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Law 12-230, April 20, 1999, law notification 46 DCR 4143).

Emergency Legislation

See notes to § 4-1201.